Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0677.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 15a. Any payments under section 7(1)(f) must be allocated as follows: (a) Twenty percent to the governing body of the jurisdiction where the internet gaming operator's casino is located for its use in connection with the provision of governmental services. (b) Seventy percent to this state to be deposited in the fund. (c) Ten percent to the Michigan strategic fund bureau created under section 5 of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2005.in section 7 of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 631 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.